Utah statutes.
31A-27a-803.   Reopening liquidation.
(1)  After a liquidation proceeding is terminated and the liquidator
discharged, the commissioner may at any time petition the court that was the
receivership court to reopen the proceedings for good cause, including the
discovery of additional property.
(2)  If the court is satisfied that there is justification for reopening the
proceedings, the court shall order the proceedings reopened.
